Utah statutes.
35A-8-1504.   Effective period of moratorium -- Extension by rule.

(1)  The moratorium shall be in effect from November 15 to March 15 of each year.

(2)  The department may, by rule, begin the moratorium at an earlier date or extend it to a later date when severe weather conditions warrant that action.

